Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.150

Conditional release—Application—Secretary's recommendation—Order—Procedure.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Persons examined pursuant to RCW 10.77.140 may make application to the secretary for conditional release. The secretary shall, after considering the reports of experts or professional persons conducting the examination pursuant to RCW 10.77.140, forward to the court of the county which ordered the person's commitment the person's application for conditional release as well as the secretary's recommendations concerning the application and any proposed terms and conditions upon which the secretary reasonably believes the person can be conditionally released. Conditional release may also contemplate partial release for work, training, or educational purposes.

(2) In instances in which persons examined pursuant to RCW 10.77.140 have not made application to the secretary for conditional release, but the secretary, after considering the reports of experts or professional persons conducting the examination pursuant to RCW 10.77.140, reasonably believes the person may be conditionally released, the secretary may submit a recommendation for release to the court of the county that ordered the person's commitment. The secretary's recommendation must include any proposed terms and conditions upon which the secretary reasonably believes the person may be conditionally released. Conditional release may also include partial release for work, training, or educational purposes. Notice of the secretary's recommendation under this subsection must be provided to the person for whom the secretary has made the recommendation for release and to his or her attorney.

(3)(a) The court of the county which ordered the person's commitment, upon receipt of an application or recommendation for conditional release with the secretary's recommendation for conditional release terms and conditions, shall within 30 days schedule a hearing. The court may schedule a hearing on applications recommended for disapproval by the secretary.

(b) The prosecuting attorney shall represent the state at such hearings and shall have the right to have the person examined by an expert or professional person of the prosecuting attorney's choice. If the committed person is indigent, and he or she so requests, the court shall assist the person in obtaining a qualified expert or professional person to examine the person on his or her behalf. An expert or professional person obtained by an indigent person who is committed to state psychiatric care following acquittal by reason of insanity shall be compensated out of funds of the office of public defense as provided in policies and procedures under chapter 2.70 RCW, in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct and the standards for indigent defense.

(c) The issue to be determined at such a hearing is whether or not the person may be released conditionally to less restrictive alternative treatment under the supervision of a multidisciplinary transition team under conditions imposed by the court, including access to services under RCW 10.77.175 without substantial danger to other persons, or substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security.

(d) In cases that come before the court under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the court may deny conditional release to a less restrictive alternative only on the basis of substantial evidence. The court may modify the suggested terms and conditions on which the person is to be conditionally released. Pursuant to the determination of the court after hearing, the committed person shall thereupon be released on such conditions as the court determines to be necessary, or shall be remitted to the custody of the secretary.

(4) If the order of conditional release provides for the conditional release of the person to a less restrictive alternative, including residential treatment or treatment in the community, the conditional release order must also include:

(a) A requirement for the committed person to be supervised by a multidisciplinary transition team, including a specially trained community corrections officer, a representative of the department of social and health services, and a representative of the community behavioral health agency providing treatment to the person under RCW 10.77.175.

(i) The court may omit appointment of the representative of the community behavioral health agency if the conditional release order does not require participation in behavioral health treatment;

(ii) The court may omit the appointment of a community corrections officer if it makes a special finding that the appointment of a community corrections officer would not facilitate the success of the person, or the safety of the person and the community;

(b) A requirement for the person to comply with conditions of supervision established by the court which shall include at a minimum reporting as directed to a designated member of the transition team, remaining within prescribed geographical boundaries, and notifying the transition team prior to making any change in the person's address or employment. If the person is not in compliance with the court-ordered conditions of release, the community corrections officer or another designated transition team member shall notify the secretary or the secretary's designee; and

(c) If the court requires participation in behavioral health treatment, the name of the licensed or certified behavioral health agency responsible for identifying the services the person will receive under RCW 10.77.175, and a requirement that the person cooperate with the services planned by the licensed or certified behavioral health agency. The licensed or certified behavioral health agency must comply with the reporting requirements of RCW 10.77.160, and must immediately report to the court, prosecutor, and defense counsel any substantial withdrawal or disengagement from medication or treatment, or any change in the person's mental health condition that renders him or her a potential risk to the public.

(5) The role of the transition team appointed under subsection (4) of this section shall be to facilitate the success of the person on the conditional release order by monitoring the person's progress in treatment, compliance with court-ordered conditions, and to problem solve around extra support the person may need or circumstances that may arise that threaten the safety of the person or the community. The transition team may develop a monitoring plan that may be carried out by any member of the team. The transition team shall meet according to a schedule developed by the team, and shall communicate as needed if issues arise that require the immediate attention of the team.

(6) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the department to develop specialized training for community corrections officers under this section. The lack of a trained community corrections officer must not be the cause of delay to entry of a conditional release order. Another community corrections officer may be appointed if no specially trained officer is available.

(7) Any person, whose application for conditional release has been denied, may reapply after a period of six months from the date of denial, or sooner with the support of the department.

(8) A person examined under RCW 10.77.140 or the department may make a motion for limited conditional release under this section, on the grounds that there is insufficient evidence that the person may be released conditionally to less restrictive alternative treatment under subsection (3)(c) of this section, but the person would benefit from the opportunity to exercise increased privileges while remaining under the custody and supervision of the department and with the supervision of the department these increased privileges can be exercised without substantial danger to other persons or substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security. The department may respond to a person's application for conditional release by instead supporting limited conditional release.

[ 2023 c 120 s 8; 2021 c 263 s 1; 2010 c 263 s 5; 1998 c 297 s 41; 1993 c 31 s 6; 1982 c 112 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 13; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 120: See notes following RCW 2.70.027.

Application—2021 c 263: "The provisions of this act apply to persons who are committed for inpatient treatment under chapter 10.77 or 71.05 RCW as of July 25, 2021." [ 2021 c 263 s 20.]

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.